District of Columbia statutes.
25-506

Minimum fees for temporary licenses.

(a)

The minimum fee for the issuance of a temporary license shall be the following:

Temporary license (class F) (beer and wine)
$100/day

Temporary license (class G) (spirits, beer, and wine)
$300/day

(b)

Upon request, the Board has the authority to reduce the fee to $150 per day, for a temporary license, class G, or to $50 per day, for a temporary license, class F, for nonprofit organizations. This reduction shall only be available once each calendar year to any single organization.

(c)

The Board may create regulations and fees, in accordance with §§ 25-211(b) and 25-502, to permit an on-premises retailer under a restaurant license to apply for a one-day substantial change to the size of their licensed premises to expand the establishment’s interior or exterior space in order to facilitate participation in community or street festivals. The Board shall not grant permission for this change more than twice in any calendar year for any establishment.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-506.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.